Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PAY FOR PERFORMANCE.new text end new text begin Of the amounts appropriated in law from the workforce development fund for grants to pass-through entities, 25 percent in fiscal year 2026 and 50 percent in fiscal year 2027 are for performance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8747. new text end